Massachusetts, session 194th, H3528.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 13 of Chapter 188 of the Session Laws of 2016 is hereby amended by striking out
the last sentence and inserting in place the following sentence:
The department of public utilities shall provide for the recovery of expenses incurred for
use of advanced leak repair technology and utility-scale non-emitting renewable thermal energy
infrastructure as part of the most cost-effective timeline under a plan submitted under section 145
of chapter 164 of the General Laws, without a reduction to the recovery for eligible pipe
replacement.
of 1